Massachusetts, session 194th, S1504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 35SSS the following section:-   
3  Section 35TTT. (a) As used in this section, the following words, unless the context 
4 clearly requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:-    
5  “Ambient air”, that portion of the atmosphere, external to buildings, to which the general 
6 public has access.  
7  “Board of health”, any body politic or political subdivision of the commonwealth that 
8 acts as a board of health, public health commission or a health department for a municipality, 

2 of 26 9 region or district, including, but not limited to, municipal boards of health, regional health 
10 districts established pursuant to G.L. c. 111, § 27B and boards of health that share services 
11 pursuant to G.L. c. 40, § 4A or other legally constituted governmental unit within the 
12 Commonwealth having the usual powers and duties of the board of health of a city or town.   
13  “Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of environmental protection   
14  “Department”, the department of environmental protection  
15  “Fund”, the PFAS Remediation Trust Fund established in this section.   
16  “Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”, as defined and regulated by the 
17 department or identified, on the basis of a health assessment conducted pursuant to the 
18 department’s drinking water regulations, as posing an unacceptable health risk to consumers.   
19  “Regional system”, any system established by mutual agreement of two or more 
20 municipalities or a county in which all municipalities of said county have an agreement where 
21 such system provides drinking water or wastewater services, or both, through shared facilities, 
22 sources or distribution networks.    
23  (b) (1) There shall be a PFAS Remediation Trust Fund. Expenditures from the fund shall 
24 be made by the department, without further appropriation and consistent with this section, the 
25 terms of settlements, judgments, and awards made in connection with claims arising from the 
26 manufacture, marketing or sale of PFAS and PFAS-containing products, and consistent with the 
27 terms of other allocations and monies transferred to this fund, as applicable. The commissioner 
28 shall administer the fund, shall prioritize expenditures to communities with vulnerable 
29 environmental justice populations, and may make expenditures from the fund to develop and 

3 of 26 30 implement a multilingual outreach and education program pursuant to section 29 of chapter 21A 
31 of the General Laws.  
32  (2) The fund shall be expended to mitigate the impacts of PFAS contamination in the 
33 commonwealth, including PFAS contamination in drinking water, groundwater, soil, sediment, 
34 surface water, wastewater, sludge or sludge products, landfills, and other media as appropriate. 
35 Such mitigation may include, but is not limited to, projects to assist counties, municipalities or 
36 other public entities with a direct impact on public water supplies, private well owners, and 
37 public water systems with the cost of PFAS treatment and remediation, including but not limited 
38 to remediation projects, treatment, and mitigation. The commissioner shall make necessary 
39 expenditures from this account for the shared administrative costs of the operations and 
40 programs of the department related to the fund. The commissioner shall further direct that 
41 monies from the fund shall be expended to provide services in an amount reasonably related to 
42 such administrative costs. No expenditure shall be made from the fund that would cause the fund 
43 to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to 
44 further appropriation and monies remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 
45 revert to the General Fund but shall instead be available for expenditure during subsequent fiscal 
46 years. Any fiscal year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from the calculation of the 
47 consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the General Laws.   
48  (3) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) amounts recovered by the commonwealth and 
49 credited thereto in connection with claims arising from the manufacture and associated 
50 processes, distribution, marketing, or sale of PFAS and other PFAS-containing products; (ii) 
51 transfers from other funds authorized by the general court and so designated; (iii) funds from 
52 public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations, rebates, 

4 of 26 53 settlements, judgments, awards, and other allocations received by the commonwealth designated 
54 to the fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such amounts.   
55  (c) The commissioner may award and administer grants from the fund, without further 
56 appropriation, consistent with the purposes of the fund described in this section. Further, subject 
57 to this section, grants may be made, without limitation, to: (i) municipalities and counties for 
58 municipal and county use, including, but not limited to, establishing connections to regional 
59 systems and funds necessary to address the reasonable administrative costs of the municipality; 
60 (ii) boards of health for use in assisting private well users; (iii) community water systems for use 
61 on an existing system or to expand a system to assist additional water users; (iv) non-transient 
62 non-community water systems; and (v) transient non-community water systems.   
63  (d) The department shall adopt regulations, rules, or policies for the use of monies in the 
64 fund and shall include conditions in grant documents to require that that applicants disclose any 
65 funds recovered from liable third parties or other sources to cover any costs eligible to be 
66 reimbursed by said grant programs and to deduct said recovered funds from the total costs in the 
67 grant application. The department shall also require any person awarded a grant for cost 
68 reimbursement to report the recovery of any such costs in the future and to reimburse the fund by 
69 reimbursing such recovered costs to the department. The department shall further adopt 
70 regulations, rules, or policies establishing criteria to ensure that an applicant shall not be eligible 
71 for grants for any project or portion of a project to the extent the negligence of the applicant 
72 caused the contamination that resulted in the exceedance of applicable state or federal standards 
73 for PFAS in drinking water, groundwater, soil, and other environmental media.   

5 of 26 74  (e) If the department provides a grant related to costs for a project for which a third party 
75 might otherwise be liable, the right to recover payment from such third party, excluding public 
76 sector fire departments for the use of Class B firefighting foam in emergency responses, shall be 
77 subrogated to the department to the extent of such grant. Any money recovered by the 
78 department from such third parties shall be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding any other 
79 general or special law to the contrary, the superior court shall have jurisdiction for subrogation 
80 claims brought pursuant to this chapter, and civil actions brought by the attorney general for 
81 subrogated claims to recover costs pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within five years 
82 from the date the commonwealth is assigned the rights to recover all such costs or five years 
83 from the date the commonwealth discovers that the person against whom the action is being 
84 brought is a person liable pursuant to law, whichever is later.  
85  (f)(1) The department may consult with the department of public health to provide 
86 funding from the fund for boards of health to establish rebate and grant programs for the 
87 reimbursement of private well users and owners for the costs of private well water sampling, 
88 installation, and operation and maintenance of PFAS treatment systems. Eligible spending for 
89 rebate shall include, but is not limited to, sampling of private well water for those PFAS that are 
90 regulated for public water systems by the department’s drinking water regulations and 
91 installation of permanent treatment systems to remove PFAS from drinking water.  Eligible 
92 spending for grants shall include, but is not limited to, payment to vendors for PFAS water 
93 testing and installation and maintenance of PFAS treatment systems, provided that such private 
94 well users and owners can establish that their income was below the state median household 
95 income rate in the year in which the costs were incurred and that such costs were incurred after 
96 the effective date of this section.  

6 of 26 97  (2) Boards of health may elect to receive funding from the fund pursuant to any program 
98 established pursuant to paragraph (1), and may apply for and receive grants from the fund 
99 necessary to cover reasonable administrative costs related to implementation of said paragraph 
100 (1). Boards of health that elect to participate shall amend their codes to require private well water 
101 quality testing for PFAS for property sales and new construction consistent with model bylaws 
102 and ordinances provided by the department through program guidance.   
103  (3) Annually, not later than August 31, boards of health that elect to participate pursuant 
104 to paragraph (2) shall submit a report to the department including information demonstrating 
105 compliance during the preceding fiscal year with said paragraph (2) and other such information 
106 as required by the department.  
107  (g) Annually, not later than October 1, the department shall file a report on the activity, 
108 revenue and expenditures to and from the fund in the prior fiscal year with the clerks of the 
109 house of representatives and the senate and the house and senate committees on ways and means, 
110 and shall make the report available on the department’s website. The report shall include, but not 
111 be limited to: (i) revenue credited to the fund; (ii) the amount of expenditure attributable to the 
112 administrative costs of the department; (iii) an itemized list of expenditures from the fund; (iv) 
113 rebate and grant expenditures to private well users and owners and municipal administrative 
114 expenses of boards of health opting into such rebate and grant programs; and (v) data and a 
115 report of how resources have been directed to environmental justice populations.  
116  SECTION 2. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
117 section 43A the following section:-   

7 of 26 118  Section 43B. (a) The department of environmental protection shall amend each 
119 groundwater discharge permit upon renewal with requirements for monitoring and reporting of 
120 per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances using United States Environmental Protection Agency 
121 analytical methods as specified by the department.   
122  (b) The department of environmental protection shall amend its surface water discharge 
123 permits issued to industrial permittees and groundwater discharge permits issued to industrial 
124 permittees upon renewal with requirements to implement best management practices for 
125 discharges of PFAS, including, but not limited to: (i) product elimination or substitution when a 
126 reasonable alternative to using PFAS is available in the industrial process; (ii) accidental 
127 discharge minimization; and (iii) equipment decontamination or replacement where PFAS 
128 products have historically been used. These industrial permittees shall include those that use or 
129 previously used PFAS or PFAS products or those where best management practices are 
130 warranted based on the department’s review of discharge monitoring.   
131  (c) The department of environmental protection shall include effluent limitations and 
132 treatment requirements for PFAS in groundwater discharge permits upon renewal.   
133  SECTION 3. The department of environmental protection shall promulgate regulations to 
134 implement a schedule for phasing out the use, sale, or distribution, or offer for use, sale, or 
135 distribution of sludge without the department’s site-specific approval in the commonwealth, and 
136 shall not include the disposal or placement of sludge at a solid waste landfill, hazardous waste 
137 landfill or sludge landfill. For the purposes of this section, “sludge” shall mean the solid, semi 
138 solid, and liquid residue that results from a process of wastewater treatment or drinking water 

8 of 26 139 treatment, and does not include grit, screening, or grease and oil removed at the headworks of a 
140 wastewater or drinking water facility.  
141  SECTION 4. Not later than December 31, 2030, the department of environmental 
142 protection shall submit a report to the Chairs of the Joint Committee on Public Health and the 
143 Joint Committee on Environment and Natural Resources regarding its progress in establishing 
144 standards to monitor PFAS in ambient air. This report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the 
145 department’s capacity to establish these standards; (ii) the steps the department has taken or 
146 plans to take to establish these standards; and; (iii) a projected timeline detailing when the 
147 department expects to finish establishing standards to monitor PFAS in ambient air.     
148  SECTION 5. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after31 
149 section 28 the following section:-   
150  Section 29. (a) The department, in consultation with the department of public health, shall 
151 develop and implement a multilingual public awareness campaign  to promote the education of 
152 Massachusetts residents, including environmental justice populations, of  per- and 
153 polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination across the commonwealth and potential health impacts 
154 of PFAS exposure.. The campaign shall include the development and distribution of educational 
155 materials, drafted in plain language to the extent possible, the content of which shall include, but 
156 not be limited to: (i) the potential health impacts  of PFAS exposure; (ii) the routes of PFAS 
157 exposure, including but not limited to, drinking water, groundwater, surface water, wastewater, 
158 land application of biosolids, landfills, air, and fish tissue; (iii) consumer products that are known 
159 to contain PFAS; (iv) PFAS in Class B firefighting foam; (v) a list of facilities that are known 
160 and potential sources of PFAS and are required to prepare a toxics use reduction plan for PFAS 

9 of 26 161 within 10 miles of the environmental justice populations; (vi) assistance programs for PFAS 
162 remediation; (vii) citizen involvement pursuant to G.L. c. 21I, § 18; and (viii) assistance 
163 programs for PFAS remediation.   
164  (b) The educational materials shall be translated into the native languages spoken by the 
165 impacted environmental justice populations based on the federal census definition of English 
166 isolation. Such educational materials shall be made available to, but not be limited to: (i) 
167 community centers; (ii) health care centers; (iii) schools, (iv) places of worship; (v) the 
168 department of education; (vi) and the department of early education and care.  
169  (c) The department may contract or associate with public and private agencies and 
170 organizations for the preparation of said educational materials on PFAS exposure, other pertinent 
171 resource information on the matter of PFAS contamination and conducting educational 
172 programs. The department may use funds from the Fund, as established in section 35TTT of 
173 chapter 10 of the general laws, for such contracts.   
174  SECTION 6. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
175 section 5S the following sections:-   
176  Section 5T. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
177 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-   
178  “Agricultural products”, any vegetable, fruit, dairy, meat, fish, and poultry, and 
179 agricultural inputs, such as, but not limited to, feed, water, fertilizer, pesticides, produced and 
180 sold commercially in Massachusetts.  
181  “Department”, the department of public health. 

10 of 26 182  “Food package", a package or packaging component that is intended for the marketing, 
183 protection or handling of a product intended for direct food contact or used to store food and 
184 foodstuffs for sale.   
185  “Fully fluorinated carbon atom”, a carbon atom on which all the hydrogen substituents 
186 have been replaced by fluorine. 
187  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
188 manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known or reasonably 
189 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
190 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
191 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions.  
192  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
193 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
194 control, or know.   
195  "Manufacturer", a person, firm, association, partnership, government entity, organization, 
196 joint venture or corporation that applies a package to a product for distribution or sale.   
197  "Package", a container providing a means of marketing, protecting or handling a product 
198 which shall include a unit package, an intermediate package, a package used for shipping or 
199 transport and unsealed receptacles such as carrying cases, crates, cups, pails, rigid foil and other 
200 trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags and tubs.   

11 of 26 201  "Packaging component", an individual assembled part of a package including, but not 
202 limited to, any interior or exterior blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior 
203 strapping, coatings, closures, inks and labels.   
204  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
205 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.    
206  (b) No manufacturer shall sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in 
207 the commonwealth food packaging to which PFAS have been intentionally added in any amount.   
208  (c) The department, in consultation with department of environmental protection and the 
209 department of agricultural resources, shall procure or otherwise employ an external research 
210 organization, which has the capacity to study per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances and the effect 
211 PFAS has on agricultural products produced and sold in the commonwealth; provided, that the 
212 research organization shall have: (1) extensive experience with a wide variety of agricultural 
213 products and environmental matrices, including, but not limited to, plants and animals; (2) a 
214 current QAPP (“Quality Assurance Project Plan”) through the United States Environmental 
215 Protection Agency; (3) current sampling and chain of custody protocols; (4) experience handling 
216 complex agricultural matrices; and (5) access to state-of-the art mass spectrometers. The study 
217 shall include findings on the levels of PFAS found in: (1) in agricultural products sold in 
218 Massachusetts stores; (2) locally sourced agricultural products; and (3) agricultural inputs 
219 including, but not limited to, feed, water, fertilizer, and pesticides. The department shall make 
220 said report publicly available with the department’s findings on the department’s website. The 
221 commissioner shall file a progress report in writing of the findings, including food and 
222 agricultural sources of contamination, within 365 days of the passage of this act; provided, that 

12 of 26 223 the report shall be filed with the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint 
224 committee on environment and natural resources, the joint committee on public health, and the 
225 joint committee on agriculture on or before August 31, 2027.  
226  Section 5U. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
227 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-    
228  “Child passenger restraint”, a child passenger restraint under G.L. c. 90, § 7AA.   
229  “Children’s product”, consumer products intended, made or marketed for use by children 
230 12 years of age or under, including: (i) toys; (ii) children’s clothing; (iii) children's cosmetics and 
231 personal care products; (iv) children's jewelry and novelty products; (v) children’s school 
232 supplies; (vi) children’s arts and crafts supplies, including model making supplies (vii) children’s 
233 bedding, furniture, and furnishings; (viii) child car seats; (ix) products to help a child with 
234 sucking or teething, or to facilitate sleep, relaxation, or the feeding of a child; (x) products that 
235 meet any of the following conditions: represented in its packaging, display, or advertising as 
236 appropriate for use by children, sold in conjunction with, attached to, or packaged together with 
237 other products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as appropriate for use by children sold 
238 in a retail store, catalogue, or online website, in which a person exclusively offers for sale 
239 products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as appropriate for use by children, or sold in 
240 a discrete portion of a retail store, catalogue, or online website, in which a person offers for sale 
241 products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as appropriate for use by children; provided, 
242 however, that “children’s product” shall not include: (i) batteries; (ii) slings and catapults; (iii) 
243 sets of darts with metallic points; (iv) toy steam engines; (v) bicycles and tricycles; (vi) video 
244 toys that can be connected to video screen and are operated at a nominal voltage exceeding 

13 of 26 245 twenty-four volts; (vii) chemistry sets; (viii) consumer and children's electronic products, 
246 including but not limited to personal computers, audio and video equipment, calculators, wireless 
247 phones, game consoles, and handheld devices incorporating a video screen, used to access 
248 interactive software and their associated peripherals; (ix) interactive software, intended for 
249 leisure and entertainment, including computer games and their storage media, including compact 
250 disks; (x) BB guns, pellet guns and air rifles; (xi) snow sporting equipment, including skis, poles, 
251 boots, snow boards, sleds and bindings; (xii) roller skates; (xiii) scooters; (xiv) model rockets; 
252 (xv) athletic shoes with cleats or spikes; (xvi) pocketknives and multitools; (xvii) pharmaceutical 
253 products and biologics; and (xviii) medical devices, as defined in the federal Food, Drug, and 
254 Cosmetic Act, U,S,C, 21 section 321(h). 
255  “Consumer product,” any article that, to any significant extent, is distributed in 
256 commerce for personal use or consumption by individuals. 
257  “Cookware”, durable houseware items that are used in homes and restaurants to prepare, 
258 dispense, or store food, foodstuffs or beverages, including, but not limited to, pots, pans, skillets, 
259 grills, baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls and cooking utensils.   
260  “Current unavoidable use”, a use of PFAS that the department has determined under this 
261 section to be: (i) essential for health, safety or the functioning of society; (ii) necessary for the 
262 proper operation and functionality of a product; and; (iii) for which safer alternatives are not 
263 reasonably available.    
264  “Department”, the department of public health.   
265  “Distributor”, any person, firm or corporation who takes title to goods, produced either 
266 domestically or in a foreign country, purchased for resale or promotional purposes.   

14 of 26 267  “Fabric treatment”, a substance applied to fabric, carpets, rugs, shoes or textiles to impart 
268 characteristics, including, but not limited to, stain resistance or water resistance.    
269  “Fully fluorinated carbon atom”, a carbon atom on which all the hydrogen substituents 
270 have been replaced by fluorine. “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters 
271 the product from the manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known 
272 or reasonably ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any 
273 degradation by-products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, 
274 mold release agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions.  
275  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
276 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
277 control, or know.  
278  “Manufacturer”, any person, firm or corporation that manufactures a product whose 
279 brand name is affixed to the product. In the case of a product imported into the United States, 
280 “manufacturer” includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the person 
281 that manufactured or assembled or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a 
282 presence in the United States.   
283  “Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
284 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.   
285  “Personal care products”, articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, 
286 introduced into or otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting 
287 attractiveness or altering the appearance. Personal care products shall include products such as 
288 skin moisturizers, perfumes, lipsticks, fingernail polishes, eye and facial makeup preparations, 

15 of 26 289 shampoos, permanent waves, hair colors, toothpastes, sunscreen, hair spray, shaving cream and 
290 deodorants, as well as any material intended for use as a component of a cosmetic product. 
291 Personal care products shall also include, but not be limited to, menstrual products such as 
292 sanitary napkins, menstrual underwear, tampons and underwear liners.   
293  “Priority product,” any child passenger restraint, children’s product, cookware, fabric 
294 treatment, personal care products, rugs and carpets, textile, textile furnishings, or upholstered 
295 furniture.  
296  “Product component”, a component of a consumer product, including the product’s 
297 ingredients or a part of the product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the consumer 
298 product is the manufacturer of the component.    
299  “Product label”, a display of written, printed or graphic material that appears on, or is 
300 affixed to, the exterior of a product, or its exterior container or wrapper that is visible to a 
301 consumer, if the product has an exterior container or wrapper.   
302  “Retailer”, any person, firm or corporation to whom a consumer product is delivered or 
303 sold, if such delivery or sale is for purposes of sale or distribution in commerce to purchasers 
304 who buy such product for purposes other than resale.   
305  “Rugs and carpets”, fabric used to or marketed to cover floors.   
306  “Textile”, any item made in whole or part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or 
307 fabric. Textile includes but is not limited to leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, 
308 and polyester.  

16 of 26 309  “Textile furnishings”, textile goods of a type customarily used in households and 
310 businesses, including but not limited to draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, bedding, towels, 
311 and tablecloths.  
312  “Upholstered furniture'', as defined in G.L. c. 94, § 270.   
313  “Wholesaler,” any person, firm or corporation to whom a consumer product is delivered 
314 or sold, if such delivery or sale is for purposes of sale or distribution in commerce to purchasers 
315 who buy such product for purposes of resale.   
316  (b) (1) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall offer for sale, sell or 
317 distribute in the commonwealth any priority products to which PFAS have been intentionally 
318 added on or after January 1, 2029.  
319  (2) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to the sale or resale of used 
320 products.   
321  (c) (1) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall offer for sale, sell or 
322 distribute in the commonwealth any consumer product that the department has identified for 
323 restriction, including but not limited to priority products, to which PFAS have been intentionally 
324 added, unless the department, in consultation with the department of environmental protection 
325 and the Toxics Use Reduction Institute, has determined that the use of PFAS in the consumer 
326 product is a currently unavoidable use and grants a temporary exemption at intervals of no more 
327 than 4 years.   
328  (2)  The department may assess a fee to cover the department’s reasonable costs and to 
329 support the purposes outlined in this section payable by a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler 

17 of 26 330 or retailer upon submission of an unavoidable use exemption request under section (c) paragraph 
331 (5). Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS Public Health Trust 
332 Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for the purposes outlined 
333 in this section.   
334  (3)  In the event that the department makes such a determination and grants an 
335 unavoidable use exemption, the department may require the manufacturer, distributor, 
336 wholesaler or retailer to label the product or products in a form and manner determined by the 
337 department.     
338  (4) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to the sale or resale of used 
339 consumer products that the department has identified for restriction, including but not limited to 
340 priority products.   
341  (5) Consumer products or product categories in which the use of PFAS is a currently 
342 unavoidable use, as determined by the department, may be exempted for a fee to cover the 
343 department’s reasonable costs and to support the purposes outlined in this section, pursuant to a 
344 process established years. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS 
345 Public Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for 
346 the purposes outlined in this section.   
347  (6)  Annually, not later than December 31, the department shall file a report on the 
348 manufacturers, distributors, wholesalers or retailers submitting unavoidable use exemption 
349 requests with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on 
350 public health, and shall make the report available on the department’s website. The report shall 
351 include, but not be limited to: (i) the full name of the manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or 

18 of 26 352 retailer applying for an unavoidable use exemption; (ii) if the department granted the 
353 manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer an exemption or not; (iii) the department's 
354 reasoning for granting the exemption; and (iv) the length of the exemption.    
355  (d)(1) The department shall, in consultation with the department of environmental 
356 protection and the Toxics Use Reduction Institute, prepare a study of significant PFAS uses in 
357 consumer products not subject to this section using publicly available information, within 4 years 
358 of the passage of this law, and shall update the study within 7 years of the passage of this law. 
359 The study shall consider whether: (i) safer alternatives to PFAS are reasonably available; (ii) the 
360 function provided by PFAS in the product is necessary for the product to perform its primary 
361 function as determined by the department; and (iii) the use of PFAS in the product is essential for 
362 health or safety. The report shall recommend additional products and product categories to be 
363 considered for restriction under this section.  
364  (d)(2) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section. The department 
365 may adopt regulations to establish additional consumer products and product components to be 
366 considered priority products covered by this section. In identifying additional product categories 
367 for analysis, the department shall consult with Toxics Use Reduction Institute and the department 
368 of environmental protection.  
369  (e) The attorney general shall have the exclusive authority to enforce the provisions of 
370 this section pursuant to G.L. c. 93A, § 4.   
371  (f) (1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
372 public health shall establish, on or before June 1, 2028, a publicly accessible reporting platform 
373 to collect information about per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, or “PFAS”, and consumer 

19 of 26 374 products or product components containing PFAS being sold, offered for sale, distributed or 
375 offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the state. The department may consult 
376 with Interstate Chemicals Clearinghouse and may collaborate with other states with prohibitions 
377 on PFAS to establish such a platform.    
378  (2) On or before June 1, 2028, and on or before June 1 of each year thereafter, a 
379 manufacturer of PFAS of a priority product, additional consumer products identified for 
380 restriction by the department or product component containing intentionally added PFAS that is 
381 sold, offered for sale, distributed or offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the 
382 state shall register the PFAS or the consumer product or product component containing 
383 intentionally added PFAS on the publicly accessible reporting platform created pursuant to 
384 paragraph (1), along with all of the following information, as applicable: (i) the name and type of 
385 consumer product or product component containing intentionally added PFAS; (ii) the universal 
386 product code, or “UPC,” of the consumer product or product component containing intentionally 
387 added PFAS; (iii) the name and address of the manufacturer, and the name, address and phone 
388 number of the contact person for the manufacturer; and (iv) any additional information 
389 established by the department as necessary to implement the requirements of this section.    
390  (3) With the approval of the department, a manufacturer may supply the information 
391 required in paragraph (2) for a category or type of consumer product rather than for each 
392 individual product.  
393  (4) In a manner determined by the department, a manufacturer shall update and revise the 
394 information required under paragraph (2) whenever there is a significant change in the 
395 information or when requested to do so by the department.    

20 of 26 396  (5) The department may establish by regulation and assess a fee payable by a 
397 manufacturer upon submission of the notification required under paragraph (2) to cover the 
398 department’s reasonable costs in developing and administering this section and to support the 
399 purposes outlined in this section collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS 
400 Public Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for 
401 the purposes outlined in this section.    
402  (6) Any information submitted to, or developed by, the department in furtherance of this 
403 section, except for the specific information required to be disclosed in subsection (f)(2) of this 
404 section shall not be a public record and shall be exempt from disclosure under clause twenty-
405 sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 and section 10 of chapter 66 of the General Laws.  
406  (g) (1) A manufacturer of consumer products registered under paragraph (2) of subsection 
407 (f) shall send an electronic notification to distributors and wholesalers of the consumer product 
408 that the consumer product contains PFAS.   
409  (2) A distributor or wholesaler who receives a notification pursuant to paragraph (1) shall 
410 send an electronic notification to retailers of the consumer product that the consumer product 
411 contains PFAS.   
412  (3) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this subsection.   
413  (4) The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this 
414 subsection under G.L. c. 93A, § 4.   
415  (h) (1) A manufacturer of any priority products that are sold, offered for sale, distributed 
416 or offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the state shall establish an audit 

21 of 26 417 program to test for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS using analytical methods 
418 approved by the department in consultation with the department of environmental protection and 
419 the Toxics Use Reduction Institute.   
420  (2) The department shall establish by regulation and assess a fee payable by a 
421 manufacturer under paragraph (1) to cover the department’s reasonable costs in testing a 
422 consumer product for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS at the request of a 
423 manufacturer. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS Public 
424 Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for the 
425 purposes outlined in this section.    
426  (i) (1) There shall be a PFAS Public Health Trust Fund. Expenditures from the fund shall 
427 be made by the department, without further appropriation and consistent with this section, and 
428 consistent with the terms of other allocations and monies transferred to this fund, as applicable. 
429 The commissioner shall administer the fund for purposes outlined in this section, and may make 
430 expenditures from the fund to develop and implement a multilingual outreach and education 
431 campaign pursuant to section 29 of chapter 21A of the General Laws.   
432  (2) The fund shall be expended to support the education of Massachusetts residents of 
433 PFAS contamination across the commonwealth and the potential health impacts of PFAS 
434 exposure, to mitigate the impacts of PFAS in consumer products in the commonwealth, and to 
435 support the development of PFAS-free alternatives by the Toxic Use Reduction Institute. The 
436 commissioner shall make necessary expenditures from this account for the shared administrative 
437 costs of the operations and programs of the department related to the fund, including but not 
438 limited to the unavoidable use exemption process under section (c) paragraph (5) and the testing 

22 of 26 439 a consumer product for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS. The commissioner shall 
440 further direct that monies from the fund shall be expended to provide services in an amount 
441 reasonably related to such administrative costs. No expenditure shall be made from the fund that 
442 would cause the fund to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund 
443 shall not be subject to further appropriation and monies remaining in the fund at the end of the 
444 fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund, but shall instead be available for expenditure 
445 during subsequent fiscal years. Any fiscal year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from 
446 the calculation of the consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the 
447 General Laws.    
448  (3) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) fees payable by a manufacturer, distributor, 
449 wholesaler or retailer upon submission of an unavoidable use exemption request under section 
450 (c) paragraph (5); (ii) transfers from other funds authorized by the general court and so 
451 designated; (iii) funds from public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, 
452 donations, rebates, settlements, judgments, awards, and other allocations received by the 
453 commonwealth designated to the fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such amounts.  
454  SECTION 7. Chapter 22D of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
455 section 6 the following sections:-  
456  Section 7. (a) The following terms shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, 
457 have the following meanings:  
458  “Department”, department of fire services  
459  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
460 manufacturing or processing of that product; and the addition of PFAS is known or reasonably 

23 of 26 461 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
462 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
463 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions.  
464  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
465 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
466 control, or know.  
467  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
468 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.   
469  (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no person, local 
470 government or state agency shall use a Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally 
471 added PFAS in any amount for training or testing purposes.    
472  (c) Any person, unit of local government, fire department, or state agency that discharges 
473 or releases Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS must notify the 
474 department of environmental protection’s emergency response line as soon as possible but no 
475 later than within  24 hours of the discharge or release.    
476  (d) The department shall assist the department of public health’s Occupational Health 
477 Surveillance Program in collecting data on occupational exposure to PFAS, including, but not 
478 limited to, firefighters.     
479  SECTION 8. Section 12 of chapter 61A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
480 inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-  

24 of 26 481  No conveyance tax under this section shall be assessed on land that is removed from 
482 agricultural or horticultural use due to regulatory action regarding the actual or suspected 
483 presence of PFAS in soil, water, or agricultural products derived from such land. For the 
484 purposes of this paragraph, “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic compounds 
485 containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom as defined under section 5U of chapter 111. 
486 The commissioner of agricultural resources, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue 
487 and the commissioner of environmental protection, may promulgate regulations to enforce this 
488 paragraph.   
489  SECTION 9. Section 13 of chapter 61A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
490 adding the following subsection:-  
491  (e) No roll-back tax imposed by this section shall be assessed on land that no longer 
492 meets the definition of land actively devoted to agricultural, horticultural or agricultural and 
493 horticultural use due to regulatory action regarding the actual or suspected presence of PFAS in 
494 soil, water, or agricultural products derived from such land. For the purposes of this subsection, 
495 “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic compounds containing at least one fully 
496 fluorinated carbon atom as defined under section 5U of chapter 111. The commissioner of 
497 agricultural resources, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner 
498 of environmental protection, may promulgate regulations to enforce this subsection.   
499  SECTION 10. The department of public health, in consultation with department of 
500 environmental protection and the department of agricultural resources, shall procure or otherwise 
501 employ an external research organization, which has the capacity to study per- and 
502 polyfluoroalkyl substances and the effect PFAS has on agricultural products produced and sold 

25 of 26 503 in the commonwealth; provided, that the research organization shall have: (1) extensive 
504 experience with a wide variety of agricultural products and environmental matrices, including, 2 
505 of 2 but not limited to, plants and animals; (2) a current QAPP (“Quality Assurance Project 
506 Plan”) through the United States Environmental Protection Agency; (3) current sampling and 
507 chain of custody protocols; (4) experience handling complex agricultural matrices; and (5) access 
508 to state of-the art mass spectrometers. The study shall include findings on the levels of PFAS 
509 found in: (1) in agricultural products sold in Massachusetts stores; (2) locally sourced 
510 agricultural products; and (3) agricultural inputs including, but not limited to, feed, water, 
511 fertilizer, and pesticides. The department shall make said report publicly available with the 
512 department’s findings on the department’s website. The commissioner shall file a progress report 
513 in writing of the findings, including food and agricultural sources of contamination, within 365 
514 days of the passage of this act; provided, that the report shall be filed with the house and senate 
515 committees on ways and means, the joint committee on environment and natural resources, the 
516 joint committee on public health, and the joint committee on agriculture on or before August 31, 
517 2027.  
518  SECTION 11. Subsection (c) of said section 43B of said chapter 21 shall take effect two 
519 years after United States Environmental Protection Agency Method 1633 is available to the 
520 public.   
521  SECTION 12. Section 3 shall take effect January 1, 2030.  
522  SECTION 13. Subsection (b) of section 5T of said chapter 111 shall take effect January 
523 1, 2028. Subsection (c) of section 5T of said chapter 111 shall take effect upon enactment.    

26 of 26 524  SECTION 14. Subsection (b) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
525 January 1, 2029.   
526  SECTION 15. Subsection (c) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
527 January 1, 2035.   
528  SECTION 16. Additional product categories added under subsection (d) of said section 
529 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect three years after the product category has been added for 
530 restriction by the department.  
531  SECTION 17. Paragraph (1) of said subsection (g) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 
532 shall take effect June 1, 2030.   
533  SECTION 18. Subsection (h) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect June 
534 1, 2028.   
535  SECTION 19. Subsection (i) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
536 January 1, 2035.   
537  SECTION 20.  Section 245 of said chapter 111 shall take effect on the 180th day 
538 following enactment.   
539  SECTION 21. Section 246 of said chapter 111 shall take effect January 1, 2028.   
540  SECTION 22. Section 7 shall take effect January 1, 2029.